District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.41

Voting agreements.

(a)

Two or more shareholders may provide for the manner in which they will vote their shares by signing an agreement for that purpose. A voting agreement created under this section shall not be subject to § 29-305.40.

(b)

A voting agreement created under this section shall be specifically enforceable.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-305.22.

Section References